Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Long-term Care Allowance.

Sec. 47.45.400.
Long-term care allowance.

The department shall exclude a personal needs allowance of $200 a month from the income calculation made for the reimbursed cost of long-term care facility services, including swing-bed facility services, paid by the department for a person who is a recipient of medical assistance benefits under AS

47.07.020

.

The department shall pay a personal needs allowance of $200 a month to a resident of a long-term care facility in the state who is without income or resources.

In this section, “long-term care facility” means an establishment, other than an Alaska Pioneers’ Home or an Alaska Veterans’ Home, that is

licensed by the department under AS 47.32 as a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility; or

owned or operated as a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility by the United States, an Indian tribe, or a tribal organization and exempt from state licensure under applicable law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 6, SLA 2011, which enacted this article, took effect on July 31, 2011.